test/src/morphology/vep-test-V-pesta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pesta: # Verb 'to wash / pestä' - full paradigm
     pesta+V+Der/da+Inf: pesta
     pesta+V+Der/des+Inf+Ine: pestes
     pesta+V+Der/den+Inf+EssInst: pesten
     pesta+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ill: pezmha
     pesta+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ine: pezmas
     pesta+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ela: pezmaspäi
     pesta+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ade: pezmal
     pesta+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg: pezen
     pesta+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg: pezed
     pesta+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg: pezeb
     pesta+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl: pezem
     pesta+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl: pezet
     pesta+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl: pezeba
